Utah statutes.
3-1-20.2.   Procedure for judicial dissolution.

(1) (a)  A proceeding by the attorney general to dissolve an association shall be brought in either the district court of the county in which the principal office or registered office of the association is situated, or the district court of Salt Lake County.

(b)  A proceeding brought by any other party specified in Section 3-1-20.1 shall be brought in the district court of the county where the association's principal office is or, if it has no principal office in this state, where its registered office is or was last located.

(2)  It is not necessary to make members parties to a proceeding to dissolve an association unless relief is sought against them individually.

(3)  A court, in a proceeding brought to dissolve an association, may issue injunctions, appoint a receiver or custodian pendent elite with all powers and duties the court directs, take other action required to preserve the association assets wherever located, and carry on the business of the association until a full hearing can be held.



Enacted by Chapter 70, 2003 General Session

